Wisconsin, session 2025, AB732.
do enact as follows:AB732,11Section 1. 94.706 of the statutes is created to read:AB732,2,6294.706 Use of neonicotinoid pesticides. Beginning on January 1, 2026, no 3person may apply a neonicotinoid pesticide to an outdoor ornamental plant, tree, or 4turf that is grown for a noncommercial use, unless the application is made as part of 5a tree injection, is done by a certified applicator, or is done during the production of 6an agricultural commodity.AB732,2,77